Wyoming statutes. Title 40 Trade and Commerce
Part 9. Violations

§ 40-14-366.
Extended payment plan; terms and conditions.

Subject to the terms and conditions of this section, a consumer who is unable to repay a post-dated check or similar arrangement when due may elect once every twelve (12) months to repay the post-dated check or similar arrangement by means of an extended payment plan. The twelve (12) month period shall be measured from the date the consumer pays in full one extended payment plan with the post-dated check casher until the date that the consumer enters into another extended payment plan with the post-dated check casher.

To request an extended payment plan, the consumer, before 5:00 p.m. Mountain Time on the last business day before the due date of the outstanding post-dated check or similar arrangement, shall request the plan and sign an amendment to the original agreement which memorializes the plan’s terms.

The extended payment plan’s terms shall allow the consumer to repay the outstanding post-dated check or similar arrangement including any fee due in at least four (4) substantially equal installments and over a time period of at least sixty (60) days. Each plan installment shall be due on or after a date on which the consumer receives regular income, or if the consumer has no regular income due dates shall be a minimum of two (2) weeks between installments. The consumer may prepay an extended payment plan in full at any time without penalty. As long as the consumer complies with the terms of the extended payment plan, the plan shall be at no additional cost to the consumer and the post-dated check casher shall not charge the consumer any interest or additional fees during the term of the extended payment plan. The post-dated check casher may, with each payment under the plan by a consumer, provide for the return of the consumer’s prior held check and require a new check for the remaining balance under the plan.

If the consumer fails to pay any extended payment plan installment when due, the consumer shall be in default of the payment plan and the post-dated check casher immediately may accelerate payment on the remaining balance and take action to collect all amounts due. Upon default, notwithstanding W.S. 40-14-363(a), the post-dated check casher may charge the consumer interest on the outstanding balance at an annual rate equal to six percent (6%) plus the prime rate as listed in the Wall Street Journal on January 1 of the year in which the consumer defaults.

History:

2014 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 70, § 3, makes this act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 40-14-367.
Notification.

A post-dated check casher shall provide the following written notice with each post-dated check or similar arrangement and obtain the signature of the consumer at least annually indicating receipt of the notice:

NOTICE

STATE LAW PROHIBITS A POST-DATED CHECK OR SIMILAR ARRANGEMENT FROM BEING REPAID, REFINANCED OR OTHERWISE CONSOLIDATED BY PROCEEDS OF ANOTHER POST-DATED CHECK OR SIMILAR ARRANGEMENT ACCEPTED BY THE SAME POST-DATED CHECK CASHER.

POST-DATED CHECK ADVANCES SHOULD BE USED FOR SHORT-TERM FINANCIAL NEEDS ONLY, NOT AS A LONG-TERM FINANCIAL SOLUTION. CUSTOMERS WITH CREDIT DIFFICULTIES SHOULD SEEK CREDIT COUNSELING.

History:

2014 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2014, ch. 70, § 3, makes this act effective July 1, 2014.

§ 40-14-368.
Violations.

The administrator is authorized to enforce an appropriate remedy, penalty, action or license revocation or suspension, as provided in articles 5 and 6 of this chapter, against a person licensed under the act for a violation of 10 U.S.C. § 987, or any regulation promulgated thereunder.

History.

2013 ch. 124, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

40-14-365

Laws 2014, ch. 70, §
3.; 2021 ch. 14, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, substituted "10 U.S.C. § 987" for "any portion of Section 670 of the John Warner National Defense Authorization Act for Fiscal Year 2007 (Public Law 109-634, H.R. 5122)."

Effective dates. —

Laws 2013, ch. 124, § 4, makes this act effective July 1, 2013.